Utah statutes.
70A-9a-612.    Timeliness of notification before disposition of collateral.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), whether a notification is sent within a reasonable time is a question of fact.

(2)  In a transaction other than a consumer transaction, a notification of disposition sent after default and 10 days or more before the earliest time of disposition set forth in the notification is sent within a reasonable time before the disposition.

